Rhode Island statutes. Title 47 Weights and Measures
Chapter 2 Produce Scales in Markets

47-2-1.
Custody and maintenance of standards — Stamps and branding irons.

Every town or city sealer shall, at the expense of his or her town or city, provide therein a suitable place for the safekeeping and preservation of the weights, measures, and balances furnished by the state, which shall be used only as standards, and shall not be taken from the office. The sealer shall have the care and oversight thereof; shall see that they are kept in good order and repair; and if any portion of them are lost, damaged, or destroyed, shall, at the expense of the town or city, replace them by similar weights, measures, or balances. The sealer shall procure, at the expense of his or her town or city, a suitable set of sealing stamps for stamping dry and wine measures, with the date of the year thereon, and, for coal and wood baskets, a branding iron, with letters not less than one-half inch (1/2") high and the date of the year thereon.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

47-2-1

.

47-2-2.
Penalty for improper care of standards.

Every town or city sealer who neglects to provide a suitable place for keeping the weights, measures, and balances, or suffers any of them through his or her neglect to be lost, damaged, or destroyed, shall be fined the sum of not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

47-2-2

.

47-2-3.
Periodical testing of municipal sealers’ weights and measures by state — Fee.

Every town and city sealer shall, at least once in every two (2) year period, have the field weights, measures, and balances in his or her custody: tolerance tested for class F use, in accordance with current year national institute of standards and technology (NIST) handbook number 44 tolerance tables, at a laboratory accredited by the National Bureau of Standards and Technology; adjusted if needed; and/or replaced at the expense of the town or city if tolerance cannot be met.

Every town and city sealer shall, at least once every year, have their five (5) gallon volumetric prover: tolerance tested for Class F use, in accordance with current year National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) handbook number 105-2 tolerance tables, at a laboratory accredited by the National Bureau of Standards and Technology; adjusted if needed; and/or replaced at the expense of the town or city if tolerance cannot be met.

Town and/or city sealer field weights and/or five (5) gallon volumetric provers that do not meet or exceed the tolerance values for Class F use shall be condemned for use within the state of Rhode Island and shall be destroyed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1069, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

47-2-3

; P.L. 1960, ch. 74, § 24; P.L. 1990, ch. 90, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 376, § 1.

47-2-4.
Annual adjustment of mercantile weights and measures brought to sealer.

Every town or city sealer shall annually, at the expense of his or her town or city, advertise or post up notifications in public places in different parts of his or her town or city, for every person engaged in the trade of buying and selling, or as a public weigher, who uses weights and measures, to bring in within a certain time limited in each notification, being not less than one month from the date of the notification, his or her weights, measures, balances, and scales to be adjusted and sealed, and the sealer shall forthwith adjust and seal all weights and measures brought to him or her for that purpose.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

47-2-4

.

47-2-5.
Adjustment of weights and measures not brought in.

After the expiration of the time limited in the notification which is required to be given in §

47-2-4

, the sealer of weights and measures in every town or city shall visit the places of business, and enter upon the carts, wagons, and other vehicles then in use for business, of all the persons engaged in the trade of buying and selling or of selling, who have weights, measures, or balances which have not been sealed during the current calendar year, and try, adjust, and seal the weights, measures, or balances. The sealer shall go, at least once in every six (6) months, to every hay scale, coal scale, wagon scale, railroad track scale, or platform scale or balance used in the trade of buying and selling or of selling or for public weighing, in his or her town or city, which is not brought to him or her under the provisions of §

47-2-4

, and try, adjust, and seal the scale or balance.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 12; P.L. 1899, ch. 615, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

47-2-5

.

47-2-6.
Penalties for neglect of duty.

For every neglect of duty prescribed in §

47-2-5

the town or city sealer shall be fined a sum not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100); and every town or city sealer who shall seal any weight measure or balance otherwise than according to the town or city standard, duly tried, proved, and sealed by the director of the department of labor and training, shall be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) nor less than fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1069, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

47-2-6

; P.L. 1980, ch. 181, § 1.

47-2-7.
Fees and compensation of sealer — Condemnation of incorrect scales or balances.

The sealer of weights and measures, in any town or city, shall receive the same fee as any state sealer appointed by the state and no less than a fee of twenty-five cents (25¢) for every weight, wine, or dry measure, sealed by him or her at his or her office; the sealer shall receive a fee of twenty-five cents (25¢) for every yardstick or yard measure sealed by him or her; for sealing every spring balance of a capacity less than one hundred pounds (100 lbs.) the sealer shall receive a fee of two dollars ($2.00), for every spring balance of a capacity of one hundred (100) and less than five hundred pounds (500 lbs.), three dollars ($3.00); for every platform scale of a capacity of five thousand pounds (5,000 lbs.) or more, five dollars ($5.00); for every balance of a capacity of less than five thousand pounds (5,000 lbs.), two dollars ($2.00); for every steel yard of a capacity of fifty pounds (50 lbs.) or less, one dollar ($1.00); and for every steel yard of a capacity over fifty pounds (50 lbs.), two dollars ($2.00); every scale or balance used for weighing people shall be tested, and if found correct shall be sealed, by the sealer, and he or she shall receive a fee of two dollars ($2.00) for each and every scale or balance so sealed. If any of the scales or balances are found to be incorrect, then they shall be condemned and their use forbidden as hereinbefore provided. For proving and sealing coal and wood baskets, he or she shall receive a fee of fifty cents (50¢) each, and for every charcoal basket so sealed, sixty cents (60¢); he or she shall also have a reasonable compensation for all repairs, alterations, and adjustments that it may be necessary for the sealer to make, made by him or her, and for the expenses incurred in visiting any place, as provided for in §

47-2-5

. These fees and compensation shall be paid to the sealer by the person owning or using the weights, measures, or balances so adjusted and sealed. Every person violating the provisions of this section shall be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense, one-half (1/2) thereof to go to the town or city and one-half (1/2) to the complainant. All the fees received by any sealer of weights and measures of any town or city shall be retained by him or her as compensation for his or her services except as hereinafter provided. Any town or city council may, at any time by ordinance, fix an annual salary for the sealer of weights and measures of the town or city, and in that case the fees received by him or her shall be paid over by him or her to the town or city treasurer, at the time or times prescribed by any ordinance of the town or city.

For every spring balance or balance scale of a capacity of less than ten pounds (10 lbs.), he or she shall receive a fee of five dollars ($5.00); for every spring balance or balance scale of a capacity of more than ten pounds (10 lbs.) and less than one hundred pounds (100 lbs.), he or she shall receive a fee of six dollars ($6.00); for every spring balance, balance scale, or platform scale of a capacity of more than one hundred pounds (100 lbs.) and less than one thousand pounds (1,000 lbs.), he or she shall receive a fee of ten dollars ($10.00).

If any of the scales or balances are found to be incorrect, they shall be condemned and their use forbidden as hereinbefore provided.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

47-2-7

; P.L. 1970, ch. 267, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 450, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 272, § 1.

47-2-8.
Deputy sealers.

The different town councils of the several towns, and the city councils of cities, may appoint, upon recommendation of their respective town or city sealers, one or more persons as deputy sealers of their town or city, who shall assist the town or city sealer and, in the absence from duty of the town or city sealer, shall perform all the duties of town or city sealer as may be required of them for the time being.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

47-2-8

.

47-2-9.
Inspection fees.

The sealer of weights and measures, or his or her deputy, shall assess a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) semiannually in lieu of any cartage fee for the purpose of inspecting more than two (2) devices in accordance with their duties enumerated in chapters 2 — 12 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 396, § 1.

47-2-10.
Produce scales in markets.

Every retail food business which has a produce department and provides a scale for customers to weigh their purchases shall provide a written notice adjacent to the scale which notifies the customers that the weight registered on the scale is approximate and the scales are not certified by the sealer of weights and measures. Provided, further, that this section does not apply to roadside farm stands and farmers’ markets.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 193, § 2.